Utah statutes.
58-46a-301.   License required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of hearing instrument specialist or hearing instrument intern, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-46a-305.

(2)  The division shall issue to an individual qualified under the provisions of this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  hearing instrument specialist; or

(b)  hearing instrument intern.



Enacted by Chapter 28, 1994 General Session

